Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-2207.08
Complex residential real property, defined.

Complex residential real property means residential property in which the property to be appraised, the form of ownership, or the market conditions are complicated or atypical.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2014, § 76-2211;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 16.
August 30, 2015